Arkansas, session 2025, HB1385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 71, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
15-71-119. Notification requirements.
(a) The Oil and Gas Commission shall provide written notice of a
public hearing required by law on any permit to drill, deepen, re-enter,
recomplete, or operate any Class II underground injection control disposal
well to each member of the General Assembly who represents the district in
which the Class II underground injection control disposal well is located.
(b) The written notice required under subsection (a) of this section
shall provide:
(1) Information on how a copy of the permit application can be
accessed; and
(2) The date, time, and location of the public hearing.
*CRH100*
02-18-2025 09:54:25 CRH100

As Engrossed: H2/18/25 HB1385
(c) The written notice required under subsection (a) of this section
may be delivered by email.
/s/C. Cooper

































02-18-2025 09:54:25 CRH100